Maryland, session 2025, HB0422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–1202.
(a) Every person operating a bicycle or a motor scooter in a public bicycle area
has all the rights granted to and is subject to all the duties required of the driver of a vehicle
by this title, including the duties set forth in § 21–504 of this title, except:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0422*

HOUSE BILL 422
(1) As otherwise provided in this subtitle; and
(2) For those provisions of this title that by their very nature cannot apply.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a person has the
rights and is subject to the restrictions applicable to pedestrians under this title while the
person is lawfully operating a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle:
(i) On a sidewalk or sidewalk area; or
(ii) In or through a crosswalk.
(2) [At] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
AT an intersection, a person operating a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle is subject to all
traffic control signals, as provided in §§ 21–202 and 21–203 of this title.
(3) Section 21–506 of this title does not apply to a person operating a
bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle.
(C) (1) UNLESS OTHERWISE DIRECTED BY A TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICE,
A PERSON OPERATING A BICYCLE, PLAY VEHICLE, OR UNICYCLE AT AN
INTERSECTION WHO IS FACING A RED SIGNAL MAY ENTER THE INTERSECTION TO
CROSS THE HIGHWAY IN THE DIRECTION OF A PEDESTRIAN CONTROL “WALK”
SIGNAL DISPLAYED FOR THE PORTION OF THE HIGHWAY ON WHICH THE BICYCLE,
PLAY VEHICLE, OR UNICYCLE IS TRAVELING.
(2) BEFORE ENTERING AN INTERSECTION AS DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PERSON OPERATING A BICYCLE, PLAY
VEHICLE, OR UNICYCLE SHALL YIELD THE RIGHT–OF–WAY TO ANY VEHICLE OR
PEDESTRIAN LAWFULLY USING THE INTERSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.